src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_ЁЛЬЦЕ
! ёльцьʼ:ёльц%{йнңъʼØ%} 
! COPYIED ALMOST DIRECTLY FROM ИЛЪЕ
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Даремʼ ;
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Даваˮ ;
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Даремʼ ;
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Даваˮ ;
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дамда ;
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дамда ;
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Кʼ ;
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-SG-PROS_мана ;
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
:е NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
:е NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмна ;

!: SGNOMSUF ;
!: SGACCSUF ;
!: SGGENSUF ;
!: SGDATSUF ;
!: SGLOCSUF ;
!: SGABLSUF ;
!: SGPROSSUF ;
!: SGTRASUF ;
!: PLNOMSUF ;
!: PLACCSUF ;
!: PLDATSUF ;
!: PLLOCSUF ;
!: PLABLSUF ;
!: PLTRASUF ;
!+Nom: NOMINAL-CONJUGATION ;
!: POSSESSOR-INDICES ; !


LEXICON N_НЕНЭЦИЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ненэцьʼ:ненэць 30   ProsSg -мана
!! Yaml: __nyenecyh__
! ң /total=13/
! ил’(ң) yil°h	илӑнд’ yilənt°h	илаˮ yilə°q	илъе yil°ye
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E-SG-NOM ;
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E-OTHERS ;
!EVEN
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Даремʼ ;
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Дремʼ ;
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;
! +Pred+Acc+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl.
! +Pred+Gen+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl.
! +Pred+Nom+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, +PxSg3, PxDu. PxPl.
! +Equ, +Equ+Lat
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Кʼ ;
! +Du{+Acc|+Gen|+Nom}
! +Pl+Dat, +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScDu3, +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3
! +Pl+Dat+PxSg{1|2}
! +Sg+Dat{+PxSg{1|2|3}|+PxDu{2|3}|+PxPl{2|3}}
! +Pl+Abl; +Sg+Abl
! +Sg+Acc+PxSg2
! +Sg+Gen{+PxPl1|+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg|+PxSg2}
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кна ;
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-SG-PROS_вна ;
!:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
! +Sg+Acc{+PxDu1|+PxPl1}
! +Sg+Gen+PxDu1
! +Sg+Nom{PxDu1||PxDu3|+PxPl1|+PxPl3|+PxSg3}
! +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+{+Aor|+Prt1}+Sc{Du|Pl}{1|2}
! +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+Sc{Sg1|Sg2}
! +Sg+Nom{X}+Der/Cop+Ind{Y}+ScSg3
! {X}= +PxSg3, +PxDu1, +PxDu3, +PxPl1, +PxPl3
! {Y}= +Aor, +Prt1
! +Tra
:ие NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
:ие NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмна ;

LEXICON N_ПАХАЁ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ пӑхӑʼ: 31   ProsSg -мна
! ң /total=2/
! пӑхӑ’(ң) pəx°h	пӑхӑнд’ pəxənt°h	пӑхаˮ pəxə°q	пӑхӑё pəx°yo
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
!EVEN
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Даремʼ ;
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Даремʼ ;
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
! +Pred+Acc+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl.
! +Pred+Gen+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl.
! +Pred+Nom+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, +PxSg3, PxDu. PxPl.
! +Equ, +Equ+Lat
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Кʼ ;
! +Du{+Acc|+Gen|+Nom}
! +Pl+Dat, +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScDu3, +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3
! +Pl+Dat+PxSg{1|2}
! +Sg+Dat{+PxSg{1|2|3}|+PxDu{2|3}|+PxPl{2|3}}
! +Pl+Abl; +Sg+Abl
! +Sg+Acc+PxSg2
! +Sg+Gen{+PxPl1|+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg|+PxSg2}
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-SG-PROS_мана ;
:°%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
:а%{йнңъʼØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
! +Sg+Acc{+PxDu1|+PxPl1}
! +Sg+Gen+PxDu1
! +Sg+Nom{PxDu1||PxDu3|+PxPl1|+PxPl3|+PxSg3}
! +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+{+Aor|+Prt1}+Sc{Du|Pl}{1|2}
! +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+Sc{Sg1|Sg2}
! +Sg+Nom{X}+Der/Cop+Ind{Y}+ScSg3
! {X}= +PxSg3, +PxDu1, +PxDu3, +PxPl1, +PxPl3
! {Y}= +Aor, +Prt1
! +Tra
:ё NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
:ё NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмна ;

LEXICON N_СЕРО  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ серˮ: 32   ProsSg -мана / -мня
! /total=16/
! серˮ syer	серт’ syert°h	серˮ syer°q	серо syero
:%{дˮØ%} SGDATSUF ;
:%{дˮØ%} SG-ACC-STEM ;
:%{дˮØ%} SG-NOM-STEM ;
:%{дˮØ%} PLNOMSUF ;
:%{дˮØ%} PLACCSUF_О ;

LEXICON N_ТАРЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ тӑрˮ:тар 33   ProsSg -мня
! /total=0/
! тӑрˮ tər	тӑрт’ tərt°h	тӑрˮ tər°q	тӑре tərye
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Дваˮ ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Дремʼ ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дамда ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дмда ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;
! +Pred+Acc+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl.
! +Pred+Gen+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl.
! +Pred+Nom+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, +PxSg3, PxDu. PxPl.
! +Equ, +Equ+Lat
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Кʼ ;
! +Du{+Acc|+Gen|+Nom}
! +Pl+Dat, +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Aor+ScDu3, +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3
! +Pl+Dat+PxSg{1|2}
! +Sg+Dat{+PxSg{1|2|3}|+PxDu{2|3}|+PxPl{2|3}}
! +Pl+Abl; +Sg+Abl
! +Sg+Acc+PxSg2
! +Sg+Gen{+PxPl1|+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg|+PxSg2}
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Каня ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кна ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кня ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-SG-PROS_вна ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-SG-PROS_вня ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
:%{дˮØ%} NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS_Дё ;
! +Sg+Acc{+PxDu1|+PxPl1}
! +Sg+Gen+PxDu1
! +Sg+Nom{PxDu1||PxDu3|+PxPl1|+PxPl3|+PxSg3}
! +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+{+Aor|+Prt1}+Sc{Du|Pl}{1|2}
! +Nom+Der/Cop+Ind+Prt1+Sc{Sg1|Sg2}
! +Sg+Nom{X}+Der/Cop+Ind{Y}+ScSg3
! {X}= +PxSg3, +PxDu1, +PxDu3, +PxPl1, +PxPl3 
! {Y}= +Aor, +Prt1
! +Tra
:е NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
:е NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;
!:%^PalVariation%{дˮØ%} NMN_МУНО ; !! Vowel variation
!:е MUNO_O ;
!: NMN_ТАРЕ ;

LEXICON N_МАНСО  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ мӑнˮ: 34   ProsSg -мна
! /total=6/
! мӑнˮ(с) mən°q	мӑнӑт’ mənət°h	мӑнӑсˮ mənəs°q	мӑнсо mən°so
:°С1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
:°С1 NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-PRED-NOM_Даваˮ ;
:°С1 NEW-AFF-3CENTERS-EQU_Даремʼ ;
:°С1 NEW-AFF-2CENTERS-CLOSED-PRED-ACC/GEN_Дамда ;
:°С1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
:°С1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Кʼ ;
:°С1 NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
:°С1 NEW-SG-PROS_мана ;
:°С1 NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
:со NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
:со NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмна ;

!:аС1 SG-NOM-STEM ;
!:С1 SGPROSSUF ;
!:аС1 PLNOMSUF ;
!:С1 PLACCSUF_О ;
